Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2065.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 5925XS (3) 91 as/js S.F. 2065 Section 1. Section 725.1, subsection 2, Code 2026, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 2. a. Except as provided in paragraph âbâ , a person who 3 purchases or offers to purchase another personâs services as a 4 partner in a sex act commits an aggravated misdemeanor a class 5 âDâ felony . 6 b. A person who purchases or offers to purchase services as 7 a partner in a sex act from a person who is under the age of 8 eighteen, or who is reasonably believed to be under the age of 9 eighteen including a law enforcement officer or agent posing 10 as a minor under the age of eighteen, commits a class âDâ âCâ 11 felony. 12